Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3531
Hospital districts; petition; hearing; notice; modification of boundaries.

Upon receipt of such petition, the county board shall examine it to determine whether it complies with the requirements of section 23-3530. Upon finding that such petition complies with such requirements, the county board shall set a hearing thereon and cause notice thereof to be published at least three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation throughout the area to be included in such proposed district. Such notice shall contain a statement of the information contained in such petition and of the date, time, and place at which such hearing shall be held and that at such hearing proposals may be submitted for the exclusion of land from, or the inclusion of additional land in such proposed district or for modification of the boundaries of the areas into which such district shall be divided for the purpose of election of members of the board of directors.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 3, p. 375;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.22.

Notice is complete upon distribution of last issue of paper although three full weeks have not elapsed since first publication. Syfie v. Tri-County Hospital Dist., 186 Neb. 478, 184 N.W.2d 398 (1971).